Hawaii, session 2026, SB2040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to propose an amendment to article I, section 4, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii to provide that the participation of non-natural persons in election activities and campaign finance activities may be regulated, restricted, or prohibited as provided by law. SECTION 2.  Article I, section 4, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended to read as follows: "FREEDOM OF RELIGION, SPEECH, PRESS, ASSEMBLY AND PETITION Section 4.  No law shall be enacted respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof, or abridging the freedom of speech or of the press or the right of the people peaceably to assemble and to petition the government for a redress of grievances[.]; provided that the participation of non-natural persons in election activities and campaign finance activities may be regulated, restricted or prohibited as provided by law." SECTION 3. The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall the provision of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii that protects the freedom of speech be amended to provide that the participation of non-natural persons in election activities and campaign finance activities may be regulated, restricted, or prohibited as provided by law?" SECTION 4. Constitutional material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 5. This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________